Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 12
BUSINESS IMPROVEMENT DISTRICTS

Law reviews:

For article, "Improvement Districts for

C

olorado

C

ounties, Cities, and Towns", see 30 Colo. Law. 53 (Jan. 2001).

31-25-1201. Short title.

This part 12 shall be known and may be cited as the "Business Improvement District Act".

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1128, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1202. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly declares that the organization of business improvement districts within municipalities of the state, having the purposes and powers provided in this part 12, will serve a public purpose; will promote the health, safety, prosperity, security, and general welfare of the inhabitants thereof, the property owners therein, and all the people of the state; will promote the continued vitality of commercial business areas within municipalities; and will be of special benefit to the property within the boundaries of any district created pursuant to this part 12.

The general assembly further declares that the creation of business improvement districts pursuant to this part 12 implements section 18 (1)(d) of article XIV of the state constitution and is essential to the continued economic growth of the state.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1128, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1203. Definitions.

As used in this part 12, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Board" means the board of directors of a business improvement district.

"Commercial property" means any taxable real or personal property which is not classified for property tax purposes as either residential or agricultural.

"District" means a business improvement district formed by a municipality pursuant to this part 12.

"Elector" means a natural person who is a citizen of the United States and a resident of the State of Colorado, who is eighteen years of age or older, and who:

Makes his primary dwelling place in the district; or

Owns taxable real or personal property within the boundaries of the district; or

Is the holder of a leasehold interest in taxable real or personal property within the boundaries of the district; or

Is the natural person designated by an owner or lessee of taxable real or personal property in the district which is not a natural person to vote for such owner or lessee. Such designation must be in writing and filed with the secretary of the district. Only one such person may be designated by an owner or lessee.

Nothing in this subsection (4) shall permit an elector to cast more than one vote.

"Improvements" means public improvements, including but not limited to streets, sidewalks, curbs, gutters, pedestrian malls, streetlights, drainage facilities, landscaping, decorative structures, statuaries, fountains, identification signs, traffic safety devices, bicycle paths, off-street parking facilities, benches, rest rooms, information booths, public meeting facilities, and all necessary, incidental, and appurtenant structures and improvements. "Improvements" also includes the relocation and improvement of existing utility lines.

"Net effective interest rate" means the net interest cost of securities divided by the sum of the products derived by multiplying the principal amount of the securities maturing on each maturity date by the number of years from their date to their respective maturities. In all cases, "net effective interest rate" shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the securities.

"Net interest cost" means the total amount of interest to accrue on securities from their date to their respective maturities, less the amount of any premium above par, or plus the amount of any discount below par, at which said bonds are being or have been sold. In all cases, "net interest cost" shall be computed without regard to any option of redemption prior to the designated maturity dates of the securities.

"Operating plan" means the operating plan approved by the municipality pursuant to section 31-25-1211.

"Publication" has the same meaning as that set forth in section 32-1-103 (15), C.R.S.

"Service area" means the area within the municipality which is described in the ordinance creating a district pursuant to this part 12, no less than fifty percent of which area shall have been developed and used as commercial property prior to the adoption of such ordinance and, at the time of the adoption of such ordinance, shall be used primarily as commercial property. Notwithstanding any provision in this subsection (10) to the contrary, the service area may include a location designated by the municipality, after public notice and hearing, as a location for new business or commercial development. Property which is not commercial property and which is within the "service area" of a district shall not be subject to the revenue-raising powers of the district until it becomes commercial property and is included within the district's boundaries, as provided in section 31-25-1208.

"Services" means the services described in section 31-25-1212 (1)(f).

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1128, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

(10) amended, p. 758, § 1, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

Section 9 of chapter 128, Session Laws of Colorado 1991, provides that section 1 of the act amending subsection (10) does not apply to any business improvement district formed prior to May 20, 1991, pursuant to part 12 of article 25 of title 31, unless the board of directors of such district adopts a resolution directing that said section 1 applies to such district.

31-25-1204. Authority of governing body.

The governing body of every municipality is hereby vested with jurisdiction to create and establish one or more districts within the boundaries of the municipality pursuant to the provisions of this part 12, and such districts shall have all the powers provided in this part 12 which are authorized by the ordinance creating the district, or any amendment to the ordinance, adopted by the governing body. When the approval of the municipality is required by this part 12, such approval shall be given by the governing body or such other board or official of the municipality as may be designated by the charter or ordinances of the municipality unless the approval of the municipality is expressly required by this part 12.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1130, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1205. Organizational procedure.

The organization of a district shall be initiated by a petition filed in the office of the clerk of the governing body.

The petition shall be signed by persons who own real or personal property in the service area of the proposed district having a valuation for assessment of not less than fifty percent, or such greater amount as the governing body may provide by ordinance, of the valuation for assessment of all real and personal property in the service area of the proposed district and who own at least fifty percent, or such greater amount as the governing body may provide by ordinance, of the acreage in the proposed district. The petition shall set forth:

The name of the proposed district, which shall include a descriptive name and the words "business improvement district";

A general description of the boundaries and service area of the proposed district;

A general description of the types of services or improvements or both to be provided by the proposed district;

The names of three persons to represent the petitioners, who have the power to enter into agreements relating to the organization of the district; and

A request for the organization of the district.

The petition shall be accompanied by a bond with security approved by the governing body or a cash deposit sufficient to cover all expenses connected with the proceedings in case the organization of the district is not effected. If at any time during the organization proceedings the governing body determines that the bond first executed or the amount of the cash deposited is insufficient in amount, it may require the execution of an additional bond or the deposit of additional cash within a time to be fixed, not less than ten days thereafter, and, upon failure of the petitioners to file or deposit the same, the petition shall be dismissed.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1130, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1206. Notice of hearing.

The governing body, as soon as possible after the filing of the petition, shall fix by order the place and time, not less than twenty days nor more than forty days thereafter, for a hearing thereon. Thereupon, the clerk of the governing body shall cause notice by publication to be made of the pendency of the petition, of the service area, boundaries, improvements, and services of the proposed district, and of the time and place of hearing thereon. The clerk shall also cause a copy of said notice to be mailed by first-class mail to each property owner within the service area and boundaries of the proposed district at his last-known address, as disclosed by the tax records of the county or counties in which the municipality is located. No member of the governing body shall be disqualified to perform any duty imposed by this part 12 by reason of direct or indirect ownership of property within the service area or boundaries of any proposed district, by reason of relationship to any person who owns property within the proposed district or service area, or by reason of ownership of or employment by any entity which owns property within the proposed district or service area.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1131, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 758, § 2, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

Section 9 of chapter 128, Session Laws of Colorado 1991, provides that section 2 of the act amending this section does not apply to the organization of any proposed district for which a petition for organization is filed prior to May 20, 1991, pursuant to § 31-25-1205.

31-25-1207. Hearing - findings - when action barred.

On the date fixed for such hearing or at any adjournment thereof, the governing body shall ascertain, from the tax rolls of the county or counties in which the district is located, the total valuation for assessment of the taxable real and personal property in the service area and the classification of taxable property. If it appears that said petition is not signed in conformity with this part 12, the governing body shall dismiss the petition and adjudge the cost against those executing the bond or depositing the cash filed to pay such costs. Nothing in this section shall prevent the filing of a subsequent petition for a similar district.

The findings of the governing body upon the question of the genuineness of the signatures and all matters of fact incident to such determination shall be final and conclusive.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 91, p. 759, § 3, effective May 20, 1991.)

Prior to the organization of the district, the governing body may exclude property from the service area or boundaries of the district if it deems such exclusion to be in the best interests of the district or required by section 31-25-1208.

If it appears that an organization petition has been duly signed and presented in conformity with this part 12, that the allegations of the organization petition are true, and that the types of services or improvements to be provided by the proposed district are those services or improvements which best satisfy the purposes set forth in this part 12, the governing body, upon the completion of the hearing, shall, by ordinance, adjudicate all questions of jurisdiction and may, in its sole discretion, declare the district organized, describe the boundaries and service area of the district, and give it the corporate name specified in the petition by which, in all subsequent proceedings, it shall thereafter be known. The district shall be a quasi-municipal corporation and political subdivision of the state with all powers and responsibilities thereof.

Such ordinance shall finally and conclusively establish the regular organization of the district against all persons unless an action, including an action for certiorari review, attacking the validity of the district is commenced in a court of competent jurisdiction within sixty days after the effective date of such ordinance. Thereafter, any such action shall be perpetually barred. The organization of said district shall not be directly or collaterally questioned in any suit, action, or proceeding, except as provided in this subsection (6).

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1131, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 759, § 3, effective May 20.

Editor's note:

Section 9 of chapter 128, Session Laws of Colorado 1991, provides that section 3 of the act amending this section does not apply to the organization of any proposed district for which a petition for organization is filed prior to May 20, 1991, pursuant to § 31-25-1205.

31-25-1208. Boundaries - exclusion proviso.

The boundaries of a district may consist of contiguous or noncontiguous tracts or parcels of commercial property. No property shall be included within the boundaries of the district which is not commercial property. No district may be organized wholly or partly within an existing district.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part 12 to the contrary, no tract of land which is classified for property tax purposes as residential or agricultural shall be included in the boundaries of any district organized pursuant to this part 12. No personal property which is situated upon real estate not included in the boundaries of a district shall be included within such district. If, contrary to the provisions of this section, any such tract, parcel, or personal property is included in the boundaries of any district, the owners thereof, on petition to the governing body, shall be entitled to have such property excluded from such district free and clear of any contract, obligation, lien, or charge to which it may be liable as a part of such district.

If the property tax classification of any tract of land lying within the service area of any district organized under the provisions of this part 12 has been or is changed from residential or agricultural to any other classification, such lands and the personal property thereon shall no longer be excluded from the boundaries of said district and shall be subject to all obligations, liens, or charges of such district on and after January 1 of the year following such change.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1132, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1209. Board of directors - duties.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection (1), the governing body of the municipality which creates the district shall constitute ex officio the board of directors of the district. In such event, the presiding officer of the governing body shall be ex officio the presiding officer of the board, the clerk of the governing body shall be ex officio the secretary of the board, and the treasurer of the municipality shall be ex officio the treasurer of the board. A quorum of the governing body shall constitute a quorum of the board.

The governing body of the municipality may, at any time, provide by ordinance for the creation of a board of directors of the district consisting of not fewer than five members. Each member shall be an elector of the district appointed by the governing body or, if designated by the governing body, by the mayor of the municipality; except that, if possible, no more than one-half of the members of the board may be affiliated with one owner or lessee of taxable real or personal property in the district. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of the municipality. Within thirty days after a vacancy occurs, a successor shall be appointed in the same manner as the original appointment. Within thirty days after his appointment, except for good cause shown, each member shall appear before an officer authorized to administer oaths and take an oath that he will faithfully perform the duties of his office as required by law and will support the constitution of the United States, the state constitution, and laws made pursuant thereto. A majority of the members shall constitute a quorum of the board. The board shall elect one of its members as presiding officer, one of its members as secretary, and one of its members as treasurer. The office of both secretary and treasurer may be filled by one person.

If more than one-half of the property located within the district is also located within an urban renewal area, a downtown development authority, or a general improvement district, the governing body of the municipality may, at any time, provide by ordinance that the governing body of the urban renewal authority, downtown development authority, or general improvement district created by the municipality shall constitute ex officio the board of directors of the district. In such event, the officers of such entity shall be ex officio the officers of the board. A quorum of the board of directors of such entity shall constitute a quorum of the board.

If the petition initiating the organization of the district or any subsequent petition signed by persons who own real or personal property in the service area of the proposed district having a valuation for assessment of not less than fifty percent, or such greater amount as the governing body may provide by ordinance, of the valuation for assessment of all real and personal property in the service area of the proposed district and who own at least fifty percent, or such greater amount as the governing body may provide by ordinance, of the acreage in the proposed district so specifies, the members of the board of the district shall be elected by the electors of the district. If such a petition is approved, the terms of members of the board must be specified by ordinance of the governing body and shall be the same as the terms of directors of special districts pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S. The initial election for members of the board must be held within ninety days after approval of the ordinance organizing the district or the filing of any subsequent petition. All subsequent elections for members of the board must be on the regular election date specified in article 1 of title 32, C.R.S., for special districts. The number of directors, the quorum requirements, and the oaths of office shall be the same as those provided for directors of special districts pursuant to article 1 of title 32, C.R.S. Any vacancy on the board must be filled in the same manner as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection (1). Until the members of the board are elected and qualified, the governing body shall serve as the board of the district. Elections pursuant to this paragraph (d) must be held in accordance with the provisions of part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S. The cost of any election held pursuant to this paragraph (d) must be borne by the district.

The governing body of the municipality may remove a member of the board of a district or the entire board thereof for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, but only after the member or the board has been given a copy of the charges made by the governing body against such member or such board and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel before the governing body. In the event of the removal of any member of the board or of the board pursuant to this paragraph (e), the governing body shall file in the office of the clerk thereof a record of the proceedings, together with the charges made against the member or the board and the findings thereon.

Ten percent of the electors of a district may petition the governing body of the municipality for the removal of a member of the board of the district or of the entire board thereof for inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, and the governing body may remove the member or the board, but only after the member or the board has been given a copy of the charges made against such member or such board and has had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel before the governing body. In the event of the removal of the member or of the board pursuant to this paragraph (f), the governing body shall file in the office of the clerk thereof a record of the proceedings, together with the charges made against the member or the board and the findings thereon.

The board shall adopt a seal. The secretary shall keep in a visual text format that may be transmitted electronically a record of all proceedings, minutes of meetings, certificates, contracts, and corporate acts of the board, which shall be open to inspection by the electors of the district and other interested parties. The treasurer shall keep permanent records containing accurate accounts of all money received by and disbursed for and on behalf of the district and shall make such annual or other reports to the municipality as it may require. All budgets and financial records of the district, whether governed by a separate board or by the governing body of the municipality, shall be kept in compliance with parts 1 and 5 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

Each member of the board of a district or the governing body of the municipality or other entity acting ex officio as the board of a district is required to disclose any potential conflicting interest in any transaction of the district pursuant to section 18-8-308, C.R.S. A board member with a potential conflicting interest in a district transaction may not participate in the considerations of and vote on the transaction, may not attempt to influence any of the contracting parties, and may not act directly or indirectly for the board in the inspection, operation, administration, or performance of any contract related to the transaction. Ownership, in and of itself, by a board member of property within the district shall not be considered a potential conflicting interest.

When the governing body of the municipality establishes a board of directors pursuant to paragraph (b), (c), or (d) of subsection (1) of this section, it may set such conditions, limitations, procedures, duties, and powers under which the board shall conduct its business. Such conditions and limitations may be in the form of a binding contract on both the governing body of the municipality and the board and may include provisions requiring the dissolution of the board after a specified length of time, at which time the governing body of the municipality shall assume all powers and duties of the district, including the payment of any outstanding indebtedness.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1132, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

(1)(b) amended, p. 760, § 4, effective May 20.

L. 2009:

(2) amended, (HB 09-1118), ch. 130, p. 562, § 8, effective August 5.

L. 2014:

(1)(d) amended, (HB 14-1164), ch. 2, p. 69, § 28, effective February 18.

Editor's note:

Section 9 of chapter 128, Session Laws of Colorado 1991, provides that section 4 of the act amending subsection (1)(b) does not apply to any business improvement district formed prior to May 20, 1991, pursuant to part 12 of article 25 of title 31, unless the board of directors of such district adopts a resolution directing that said section 4 applies to such district.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1164, see section 1 of chapter 2, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.

31-25-1210. Meetings.

Upon notice to each member of the board, the board shall hold meetings, which shall be held in a place to be designated by the board as often as the needs of the district require. The meetings of the board shall be subject to the provisions of part 4 of article 6 of title 24, C.R.S. The board shall act by resolution or motion.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1134, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 821, § 7, effective June 1.

31-25-1211. Approval of actions by municipality.

No district created under the provisions of this part 12 shall issue bonds, levy taxes, fees, or assessments or provide improvements or services unless the municipality has approved an operating plan and budget for the district. The operating plan or budget shall specifically identify the services or improvements to be provided by the district, the taxes, fees, or assessments to be imposed by the district, the estimated principal amount of bonds to be issued by the district, and such additional information as the municipality may require. The district shall file an operating plan and its proposed budget for the next fiscal year with the clerk of the municipality no later than September 30 of each year. All of the business records of the district shall be considered public records, as defined in section 24-72-202 (6), C.R.S., and shall promptly be made available to the municipality upon request. For the purposes of this section, the business records of the district shall not include the business records of the owners of property in the district. The municipality may require the district to supplement the district's operating plan or budget where necessary. The municipality shall approve or disapprove the operating plan and budget within thirty days after receipt of such operating plan and budget and all requested documentation relating thereto, but not later than December 5 of the year in which such documents are filed. Thereafter, the services, improvements, and financial arrangements of the district shall conform so far as practicable to the operating plan and the budget. The operating plan and the budget may, from time to time, be amended by the district with the approval of the municipality in substantially the same manner as the process for formulating the operating plan and budget for each year. Any material departure from the operating plan and the budget, as originally approved or amended from time to time, may be enjoined by an order of the municipality filed with the board.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1135, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 760, § 5, effective May 20.

31-25-1212. General powers of district.

The district has the following powers, except as limited by the operating plan:

To have perpetual existence;

To have and use a corporate seal;

To sue and be sued and be a party to suits, actions, and proceedings;

To enter into contracts and agreements, except as otherwise provided in this part 12, affecting the affairs of the district, including contracts with the United States and any of its agencies or instrumentalities;

To borrow money and incur indebtedness for the purposes of the district and evidence the same by certificates, warrants, notes, and debentures and to issue negotiable bonds in accordance with the provisions of this part 12;

To provide any of the following services within the district:

Consulting with respect to planning or managing development activities;

Maintenance of improvements, by contract, if it is determined to be the most cost-efficient;

Promotion or marketing of district activity;

Organization, promotion, marketing, and management of public events;

Activities in support of business recruitment, management, and development;

Security for businesses and public areas located within the district;

Snow removal or refuse collection, by contract, if it is determined to be the most cost-efficient;

Providing design assistance;

To acquire, construct, finance, install, and operate the improvements contemplated by this part 12 and all property, rights, or interests incidental or appurtenant thereto and to dispose of real and personal property and any interest therein, including leases and easements in connection therewith;

To refund any bonds of the district pursuant to article 56 of title 11, C.R.S.;

To have the management, control, and supervision of all the business and affairs of the district and of the acquisition, construction, financing, installation, and operation of district improvements and the financing and operation of district services therein;

To construct and install improvements across or along any public street, alley, or highway and to construct works across any stream of water or watercourse. The district shall promptly restore any such street or highway to its former state of usefulness as nearly as possible and shall not use the same in such manner as completely or unnecessarily to impair the usefulness thereof. The use and occupation of streets, alleys, and highways and the construction or installation of improvements by any district shall be in accordance with the provisions of all applicable municipal ordinances and state law and with such reasonable rules and regulations as may be prescribed by either the municipality affected or the department of transportation. Plans and specifications of proposed improvements shall be approved by the municipality before construction or installation of improvements is commenced. Plans and specifications of proposed district improvements across or along any street or highway which is part of the state highway system for which the department of transportation has jurisdiction shall be approved in writing by the department of transportation before such improvements may be constructed or installed. Such approval by the department of transportation, if granted, shall not relieve the district of any responsibility for such improvements.

To fix, and from time to time increase or decrease, rates, tolls, or charges for any services or improvements furnished by the district. The board may pledge such revenue for the payment of any bonds of the district. Until paid, all rates, tolls, or charges shall constitute a perpetual lien on and against the commercial property served within the boundaries of the district, and any such lien on personal property or any such lien on real property may be foreclosed in the same manner as provided in article 20 of title 38, C.R.S., or article 22 of title 38, C.R.S., respectively. The board may shut off or discontinue service for delinquencies in the payment of such rates, tolls, or charges or for delinquencies in the payment of taxes levied pursuant to this part 12 and shall prescribe and enforce rules and regulations for connecting with and disconnecting from such services and facilities.

To appoint an advisory board of owners of property within the boundaries of the district and provide for the duties and functions thereof;

To hire employees or retain agents, engineers, consultants, attorneys, and accountants;

To adopt and amend bylaws not in conflict with the constitution and laws of the state or with the ordinances of the municipality affected for carrying on the business, objects, and affairs of the board and of the district; and

To exercise all rights and powers necessary or incidental to or implied from the specific powers granted in this part 12. Such specific powers shall not be considered as a limitation upon any power necessary or appropriate to carry out the purposes and intent of this part 12.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1135, § 1, effective May 6.

L. 91:

(1)(k) amended, p. 761, § 6, effective May 20; (1)(j) amended, p. 1070, § 43, effective July 1.

31-25-1212.5. Improvements - railroad quiet zones.

A district has the power to construct, maintain, and operate safety measures that are necessary to allow the municipality to restrict the sounding of locomotive horns at highway-rail grade crossings in compliance with 49 U.S.C. sec. 20153, as amended, and the applicable rules of the federal railroad administration. The district shall construct, maintain, and operate the safety measures in accordance with the provisions of section 40-4-106, C.R.S., and the standards of safety prescribed by the public utilities commission pursuant to section 40-29-110, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 348, § 4, effective August 7.

31-25-1213. Power to levy taxes.

In addition to any other means of providing revenue for a district, the board has the power to levy and collect ad valorem taxes on and against all taxable commercial property, as defined in section 31-25-1203 (2), within the boundaries of the district. Such taxes shall be specified in the petition organizing the district pursuant to section 31-25-1205. If such taxes are not so specified in the petition, then an election prior to the levying of such taxes must be held within the district. Elections held pursuant to this section shall be held in accordance with the provisions of part 8 of article 1 of title 32, C.R.S. The cost of any election held pursuant to this section shall be borne by the district. Such taxes shall be levied in accordance with the provisions of part 3 of article 1 of title 29, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1137, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1214. Determining and fixing rate of levy.

The board shall determine the amount of money necessary to be raised by a levy on the taxable property in the district, taking into consideration other sources of revenue of the district, and shall fix a rate of levy which, when levied upon every dollar of the valuation for assessment of taxable property within the district together with other revenues, shall raise the amount required by the district during the ensuing fiscal year to supply funds for paying the expenses of organization and the costs of providing the services of the district and acquiring, constructing, installing, and operating the improvements or works of the district and promptly to pay in full when due all interest on and principal of bonds and other obligations of the district. In the event of accruing defaults or deficiencies, additional levies may be made as provided in section 31-25-1215. In accordance with the time schedule provided in section 39-5-128, C.R.S., the board shall certify to the board of county commissioners of each county in which the district or a portion thereof lies the rate so fixed in order that, at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes, such board of county commissioners shall levy such tax upon the valuation for assessment of all taxable property within the district.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1137, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1215. Levies to cover deficiencies.

The board, in certifying annual levies, shall take into account the maturing indebtedness for the current and ensuing year as provided in its contracts, maturing bonds, and interest on bonds and the deficiencies and defaults of prior years and shall make ample provisions for the payment thereof. In case the moneys produced from such levies, together with other revenues of the district, are not sufficient to pay punctually the annual installments on its contracts or bonds and interest thereon and to pay defaults and deficiencies, the board, from year to year, shall make such additional levies of taxes as may be necessary for such purposes, and, notwithstanding any limitations, such taxes shall be levied and shall continue to be levied until the indebtedness of the district is fully paid.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1137, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1216. County officers to levy and collect taxes - lien.

It is the duty of the body having authority to levy taxes within such county to levy the taxes certified to it as provided in this part 12. It is the duty of all officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect and enforce such taxes at the time and in the form and manner and with like interest and penalties as other taxes are collected and, when collected, to pay the same to the district ordering its levy and collection. The payment of such collections shall be made monthly to the treasurer of the district and paid into the depository thereof to the credit of the district. All taxes levied under this part 12, together with interest thereon and penalties for default in payment thereof, and all costs of collecting the same shall constitute a lien, until paid, on and against the property taxed, and such lien shall be considered the same type of lien as that for all other general taxes.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1138, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1217. Property sold for taxes.

The taxes provided for in this part 12 shall be included as a part of general ad valorem taxes and shall be paid and collected accordingly. The sale of properties for delinquencies shall be conducted in the manner provided by the statutes of this state for selling property for nonpayment of other ad valorem taxes.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1138, § 1, effective May 6.

31-25-1218. Reserve fund.

When any indebtedness has been incurred by a district, it is lawful for the board to levy taxes and collect revenue for the purpose of creating a reserve fund in such amount as the board may determine, which may be used to meet the obligations of the district for operating charges and depreciation and to provide extensions of and betterments for the improvements of the district.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire part added, p. 1138, § 1, effective May 6.